src-fst-morphology-phonology.twolc.md
**oa:å Diphtong Simplification Part II**  

* *toahkkeY6X5jn*
* *toahkki00jn*

* ★*toahkkeY6X5jn* (is not standard language)
* ★*t0åhkki00jn* (is not standard language)

* *boalloX4j*
* *b0ållu0j*

* *roavggoX4j*
* *roavggu0j*
* ★*roavggoX4j* (is not standard language)
* ★*r0åvggu0j* (is not standard language)

* *toasºsoQ1X5jn*
* *t0ås0su00jn*

* ★*toasºsoQ1X5jn* (is not standard language)
* ★*toas0su00jn* (is not standard language)

* ★*moasºsoX5jn* (is not standard language)
* ★*m0ås0su0jn* (is not standard language)

* *moasºsoX5jn*
* *moas0su0jn*

* *goarºroY6X5jn*
* *goar0ru00jn*

* *goarroY6X5jn*
* *goarru00jn*

* ★*goarºroY6X5jn* (is not standard language)
* ★*g0år0ru00jn* (is not standard language)

* ★*goarºroY2* (is not standard language)
* ★*g0år0ru0* (is not standard language)

* *goarroY2*
* *g0årru0*

* *doad0jeY6*
* *doaddje0*

* ★*doad0jeY6* (is not standard language)
* ★*d0åddje0* (is not standard language)

* *goarºroY5d9it*
* *g0år0ru0dit*

* ★*goarºroY5d9it* (is not standard language)
* ★*goar0ru0dit* (is not standard language)

* *toab0moY6X4j*
* *toabbmu00j*

* *toabmoX4j*
* *t0åbmu0j*

* ★*toa0mboY6X4j* (is not standard language)
* ★*t0åbbmu00j* (is not standard language)

* *toabmoX7dallat*
* *t0å0mu0dallat*
* ★*toabmoX7dallat* (is not standard language)
* ★*toa0mu0dallat* (is not standard language)

* *oaddoY6X4j*
* *oaddu00j*

* *boassjkoQ1X5jn*
* *b0å0sjku00jn*

* ★*boassjkoQ1X5jn* (is not standard language)
* ★*boas0jku00jn* (is not standard language)

* *boajsstoQ1X5jn*
* *b0åj0stu00jn*

* ★*boajsstoQ1X5jn* (is not standard language)
* ★*boaj0stu00jn* (is not standard language)

* *boaggoQ1X5jn*
* *b0åkku00jn*

* ★*boaggoQ1X5jn* (is not standard language)
* ★*boakku00jn* (is not standard language)

*  examples:*

*  examples:*

*  examples:*

*  examples:*

*  examples:*

*  examples:*

*  examples:*

*  examples:*

*  examples:*

*  examples:*

**æ:e Diphthong Simplification **  

* *hærránis*
* *hæärránis*

* *hærránis#gæhttjalibme>*
* *hæärránis#gæähttjalibme>*

* *pasiænnta>Q1*
* *pasien0ta>0*

* *patænnta>Q1*
* *paten0ta>0*

* *kvotiænnta>Q1*
* *kvotien0ta>0*

* *kliænnta>Q1*
* *klien0ta>0*

* *Lævnnja>Q1*
* *Lev0nja>0*

* *a^dræssa#sáhtso>*
* *a^dræässa#sáhtso>*

* ★*a^dræssa#sáhtso>* (is not standard language)
* ★*a^dressa#sáhtso>* (is not standard language)

* *vædtsag8>X3*
* *vettsa0>0*

**ie:æä Diphthong Simplification Part I **  

* *ielvveY9ut*
* *0æälvv00ut*

* *iehttseY1up*
* *0æähtts00up*

* *giesseQ8us*
* *g0ess00us*

**ie:æä Diphthong Simplification Part II** The multichar æä is always the only option

* *jeht0sa>Y6*
* *jæähttse>0*

* *jeht0sa>Y6*
* *jæähttse>0*

* *gierre»X7dalla>t*
* *g0æä0rá»0dalla>t*

* *boarkkaQ1*
* *b0år0ka0*
* *loavddag8X3#*
* *l0åv0da00#*

**Vowel-change oa:å for verbs part I**  

**Vowel-change oa:å for verbs part II**  

* *hå0llaY2*
* *hoallá0*

* *gå0d0naY6*
* *goaddne0*

* ★*hållaY2* (is not standard language)
* ★*hållá0* (is not standard language)

* *gå0ht0saY6*
* *goahttse0*

## Stem vowel alternations

This section is divided according to stem vowels: a-, e-, o-, å-stems.

### a-stem alternations

For a-stems, there is a:e and a:i.  Each alternation is triggered by a combination of phonological content and dummy symbols.

**a:e in Present Participle of even-syllable verbs**  

* *bassa>Y6*
* *basse>0*

**a:i in Prs Prc of even-syllable verbs**  

* *basºsaY6jt#*
* *bas0si0jt#*

**a-stem vowel deletion**  

* *giedjeg9>a#*
* *giedjeg>a#*

### e-stem alternations

For e-stems, there is e:i, e:á, e:å, e:u and e:a. Each alternation is triggered by a combination of phonological content and dummy symbols.

**e:i in e-stems**  								        

* *manasseQ4j*
* *manassi0j*

* *biesseQ1j*
* *bie0si0j*

* *boaht0eY6j*
* *boahtti0j*

* *gálleQ1tj*
* *gá0li0sj*

* *gálleQ1tjav*
* *gá0li0tjav*

* *gálleQ1tjin*
* *gá0li0tjin*

* *gálleQ1tjihpit*
* *gá0li0tjihpit*

* *gálleQ1tjibá*
* *gá0li0tjibá*

* *gálleQ1tjip*
* *gá0li0tjip*

* *gálleQ1tja*
* *gá0li0tja*

* *gierre>Q1tja*
* *gie0ri>0tja*

* *gierre>Q1tj*
* *gie0ri>0sj*

The following two rules constitute a <= / => rule pair.

**e:á in certain stem types 1**  

**e:á in certain stem types 2**  

* *bárnneX4m*
* *bárnná0m*

* ★*bárnneX4m* (is not standard language)
* ★*bárnne0m* (is not standard language)

* *bálggeX4v*
* *bálggá0v*

* *gálleY3m#*
* *gállá0m#*

* *gálleQ2v#*
* *gá0lá0v#*

* *báhkoX7tj#*
* *bá0gu0sj#*

* *goahteX7tj#*
* *goa0dá0sj#*

* ★*goahteX7tj#* (is not standard language)
* ★*go00dá0sj#* (is not standard language)

**e:å in certain stem types with å as root vowel**  

* *gådeQ2v*
* *gådå0v*
* *jåhteQ2v*
* *jå0då0v*

* *gådeY2*
* *gådå0*
* *jåhteY2*
* *jåhtå0*

* *jåhteY3m*
* *jåhtå0m*

* *låhkkeY7tj#*
* *låhkkå0sj#*

**e-stem vowel deletion**  

* *ielvveY9ut*
* *0æälvv00ut*

### i-stem alternations

For i-stems, there is i:á. The alternation is triggered by a combination of phonological content and dummy symbols.

**i:á in Verb Derivation**

### o-stem alternations

The duplicates of the three lines of the two following rules are
there to resolve the => conflict between the two rules.

**o:u in certain stem types 1**  

**o:u in certain stem types 2**  

**u:o in contracted nouns**  

**o-stem vowel deletion**  

### For å-stems there is å:e and å:i and vowel deletion.  Each alternation is triggered by a combination of phonological content and dummy symbols.

**å:e in Present Participle of even-syllable verbs**  

**å:i in Actor nouns of even-syllable verbs**  

**å-stem vowel deletion**  

### alternations valid for several stem types

**Stem vowel deletion in even-syllable verbs, imp 3sg, 3du, 2pl, 3pl**  

* *ielvveY1up*
* *0æälvv00up*

* *giessaY1up*
* *giess00up*

* *bårråY1up*
* *bårr00up*

## Consonant gradation rules

The consonant gradation rules differ considerably from the corresponding rules for North Sámi. 
Instead of generalizing oversets of consonants (Cx:Cy &lt;=&gt; ...), each rule contains the
alternation for one consonant only, and to the right of the
&lt;=&gt; arrow is listed all the contexts where the relevant
alternation appears. The disadvantage with this method is that the
same context must be written several times, if e.g. both p, t and k
are deleted in the same contexts, each of these contexts must be
written several times, one for each consonant. The advantage is that
there are no conflicts during compilation, compilation takes 10
seconds rather than 3 minutes. The earlier North-Sámi-style rule
set was ordered according to CG pattern. This pattern is still
visible in the new rules, via the reference S1-3 etc. (Spiik's
Series 1, 3-letter pattern, etc) behind each subrule.

This actually opens up for a migration to an xfst rule file
instead of the current twolc format, since what xfst really cannot
do is generalize over sets (Cx:Cy etc.). This is an issue for future
revisions to decide.

The rules are divided in two subsections, deletion rules and
change (alternation) rules.

### Deletion rules

The b, d, g deletion rules are similar, via the optional ( b ) etc. in front of the "_" symbol, both
bm:m and bbm:bm alternations are covered. The contexts differ to a certain extent. For
b and d, the III-I special gradation bbm:m is covered by two separate rules,
and a special Dummy (X6), not part of the ordinary WeG set.

Note that one of the rules for t:0 refers to #: as part of its context. As soon as clitics are
added to the word form, this rule will thus not be triggered. Look into this when the clitics are added.

**Consonant gradation b:0**  deletes **b** in S7 and S9 contexts

**Consonant gradation d:0**  ... etc.

* *bednag8>X3*
* *be0na0>0*

**Consonant gradation g:0**  

**Consonant gradation k:0**  

**Consonant gradation l:0**  

**Consonant gradation m:0**  

**Consonant gradation n:0**  

**Consonant gradation p:0**  

**Consonant gradation s:0**  

* *russjpeQ1*
* *ru0sjpe0*

* ★*russjpeQ1* (is not standard language)
* ★*russjpe0* (is not standard language)

**Consonant gradation ŋ:0**  

**Consonant gradation f:0**  

**Consonant gradation r:0**  

**Consonant gradation v:0**  

**Consonant gradation j:0**  

**Consonant gradation t:0**  

* *oajváladtj#*
* *oajvála0sj#*

**Gradation Series 4, II-I, tj and ts**  

### Change rules

The Cx:Cy format was kept for hk:g, hp:b, ht:d, since the left context h:0 was unique, 
and no compilation conflict thus arose.

The bb:pp, gg:kk, dd:tt alternations were split into three rules, 
since keeping them in one Cx:Cy rule created compilation conflicts. 
Also, d:t contain a rule not found for the other two...

**Gradation Series 4, II-I**  

**bb:pp**  

* *oabbáQ1*
* *oappá0*

**gg:kk**  

* *vággeQ1*
* *vákke0*

* ★*vággeQ1* (is not standard language)
* ★*vágge0* (is not standard language)

**g:k change for clitic -ge**  

**dd:tt and dtj, dts**  

**Gradation Series 7, III-II, ks(t), kt, ktj, kts**  

Exceptional II-III inverse gradation in present participles

This gradation is only for II-I syllable verbs that get III as
present participles.

Candidates:

* bbm - bm - m
* ddn - dn - n
* ddnj- dnj- nj
* ggŋ - gŋ - ŋ
* ddj - dj - dj

* hkk - hk - g
* hpp - hp - b

* htt - ht - d
* httj- htj- tj
* htts- hts- ts

Strategy: Do insertion rule for the initial element.

**Consonant insertion as II-III strengthening gradation with bm, gŋ**  

**Consonant insertion as II-III strengthening gradation with dn/j + as I-III strengthening gradation with d**  

**Consonant insertion as II-III strengthening gradation with hk, hp,**  

**Consonant insertion as II-III strengthening gradation with htt(j/s)**  

Debugging of twol-rules

All rule conflicts have been successfully resolved. The rule file
should be kept that way. Look out for conflicts in the compilation
process, and resolve them as they appear!

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-smj/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc)</small>

---
